Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1390.01
State Recreation Road Fund; road projects authorized.

Section 39-1390 shall not prevent the expenditure of funds from the State Recreation Road Fund on road projects (1)(a) that begin upon or terminate within state highway rights-of-way or (b) that are for intersections, interchanges, or connecting ramps located within state rights-of-way, designed to connect roads of the state highway system to recreation roads, and (2) that are to be constructed as part of a recreation road improvement project.

Laws 1988, LB 814, § 1.